nb: Hylsmateriale: Juma; Uten holk; Fenol; Polykarbonat; XTC; Annet
el: Υλικό δακτυλίου σύνδεσης: Juma; Χωρίς δακτύλιο; Φαινολικό; Πολυανθρακικό; XTC; Άλλο
it: Materiale del puntale: Juma; Senza ghiera; Fenolico; Policarbonato; XTC; Altro
th: วัสดุปลอกปลายก้าน: Juma; ไม่มีเฟอร์รูล; ฟีนอลิก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต; XTC; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Materialul ferulei: Juma; Fără inel; Fenolic; Policarbonat; XTC; Altele
hu: Hüvely anyaga: Juma; Nincs ferrül; Fenolgyanta; Polikarbonát; XTC; Egyéb
cs: Materiál ferule: Juma; Bez kování; Fenol; Polykarbonát; XTC; Jiné
fi: Holkkimateriaali: Juma; Ei holkkia; Fenoli; Polykarbonaatti; XTC; Muu
pt-PT: Material da ponteira: Juma; Sem virola; Fenólico; Policarbonato; XTC; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál feruly: Juma; Bez objímky; Fenolické; Polykarbonát; XTC; Iné
nl: Ferrule materiaal: Juma; Geen ferrule; Fenol; Polycarbonaat; XTC; Overig
da: Ferrule-materiale: Juma; Uden ferrule; Fenol; Polykarbonat; XTC; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на ферулата: Juma; Без накрайник; Фенолна смола; Поликарбонат; XTC; Други
en: Ferrule material: Juma; No ferrule; Phenolic; Polycarbonate; XTC; Other
fr: Matériau de la virole: Juma; Sans virole; Phénolique; Polycarbonate; XTC; Autre
zh-TW: 桿頭先角材質: Juma; 無先角; 酚醛樹脂; 聚碳酸酯; XTC; 其他
ja: フェルール素材: ジュマ; フェルールなし; フェノール樹脂; ポリカーボネート; XTC; その他
zh-CN: 套管材料: 祖玛; 无先角; 酚醛树脂; 聚碳酸酯; XTC; 其他
pt-BR: Material da virola: Juma; Sem virola; Fenólico; Policarbonato; XTC; Outro
de: Material der Ferrule: Juma; Keine Zwinge; Phenol; Polycarbonat; XTC; Sonstige
tr: Ferül malzemesi: Juma; Yüksük yok; Fenolik; Polikarbonat; XTC; Diğer
sv: Hylsmaterial: Juma; Utan hylsa; Fenolplast; Polykarbonat; XTC; Övrigt
sl-SI: Material veznega obročka: Juma; Brez okova; Fenol; Polikarbonat; XTC; Drugo
ko: 페룰 재질: 주마; 페룰 없음; 페놀; 폴리카보네이트; XTC; 기타
pl: Materiał ferruli: Juma; Bez feruli; Żywica fenolowa; Poliwęglan; XTC; Inny
vi: Vật liệu đầu nối: Juma; Không có khâu; Phenolic; Polycarbonate; XTC; Khác
lt-LT: Antgalio medžiaga: „Juma“; Be įvorės; Fenolis; Polikarbonatas; XTC; Kita
ru: Материал ферула: Джума (Juma); Без стакана (феррулы); Фенолик; Поликарбонат; XTC; Другое
hr-HR: Materijal ferule: Juma; Bez prstena; Fenol; Polikarbonat; XTC; Ostalo
es: Material de la férula: Juma; Sin férula; Fenólico; Policarbonato; XTC; Otro